Utah statutes.
78B-2-302.   Within one year.

An action may be brought within one year:

(1)  for liability created by the statutes of a foreign state;

(2)  upon a statute for a penalty or forfeiture where the action is given to an individual, or to an individual and the state, except when the statute imposing it prescribes a different limitation;

(3)  upon a statute, or upon an undertaking in a criminal action, for a forfeiture or penalty to the state;

(4)  for libel, slander, false imprisonment, or seduction;

(5)  against a sheriff or other officer for the escape of a prisoner arrested or imprisoned upon either civil or criminal process;

(6)  against a municipal corporation for damages or injuries to property caused by a mob or riot;

(7)  except as otherwise expressly provided by statute, against a county legislative body or a county executive to challenge a decision of the county legislative body or county executive, respectively; or

(8)  on a claim for relief or a cause of action under Title 63L, Chapter 5, Utah Religious Land Use Act.



Amended by Chapter 89, 2010 General Session

